Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2306
Representation.

If representation is called for by this code, the estate is divided into as many shares as there are surviving heirs in the nearest degree of kinship and deceased persons in the same degree who left issue who survive the decedent, each surviving heir in the nearest degree receiving one share and the share of each deceased person in the same degree being divided among his issue in the same manner.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 28, UPC § 2-106.

There must be at least one survivor in a degree of kinship to apply the phrase "by right of representation." In re Estate of Evans, 20 Neb. App. 602, 827 N.W.2d 314 (2013).

When an estate is divided "by representation" as provided for in this section into as many shares as there are surviving heirs in the nearest degree of kinship, the court looks first to the decedent's siblings, then to the decedent's siblings' children, and on down the generational line until reaching a generation containing surviving heirs. In re Estate of Evans, 20 Neb. App. 602, 827 N.W.2d 314 (2013).